test/src/gt-norm-yamls/proper-smj_gt-norm.yaml
#  Propernoun - Magdalas: # BASUDIS-fem
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Magdalas
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Magdalasá
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Magdalasáv
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Magdalasán
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Magdalassaj
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Magdalasás
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Magdalasájn
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Magdalasá
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ill: Magdalasájda
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Magdalassan
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
#    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Vuollnásuoloj: # DAVVISUOLU-plc
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Vuollnásuoloj
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Vuollnásuollu
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Vuollnásuolluv
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Vuollnásuollun
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Vuollnásuolluj
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Vuollnásuollus
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Vuollnásuollujn
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: []
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: []
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: [Vuollnásuollun, Vuollnásuolon]
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Vuollnásuoloj+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: vuollnásuolluk
  
  Propernoun - Sirges: # GEAVNNIS-plc
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Sirges
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Sirggá
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Sirggáv
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Sirggán
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Sirggáj
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Sirggás
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Sirggájn
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Sirggá
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Sirggájda
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: [Sirggán, Sirgen]
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Sirges+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: sirggák

  Propernoun - Tiensjanváre: # VARGGAT-plc
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: []
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Tiensjanváre
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Tiensjanvárij
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Acc: Tiensjanvárijt
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Tiensjanvárijn
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Tiensjanvárijda
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela: Tiensjanvárijs
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Com: Tiensjanvárij
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Tiensjanvárren
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: tiensjanvárek
    
  Propernoun - Álpa: # ALEUHTAT-plc
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: []
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Álpa
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Álpaj
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Acc: Álpajt
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Álpajn
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Álpajda
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela: Álpajs
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Com: Álpaj
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Álpan
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: álpalasj
    Álpa+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: álpak
   
  Propernoun - Bahamasuollu: # SULLOT-plc
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: []
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Bahamasuollu
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Bahamasuolluj
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Acc: Bahamasuollujt
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Bahamasuollujn
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Bahamasuollujda
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela: Bahamasuollujs
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Com: Bahamasuolluj
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: [Bahamasuollun, Bahamasuolon]
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Bahamasuollu+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: bahamasuolluk

  Propernoun - Vuolleednama: # EATNAMAT-plc
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: []
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Vuolleednama
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Vuolleednamij
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Acc: Vuolleednamijt
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Vuolleednamijn
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Vuolleednamijda
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela: Vuolleednamijs
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Com: Vuolleednamij
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Vuolleednamin
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Vuolleednama+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
  
#  Propernoun - Vuorká-Dávvira: # EATNAMAT-org
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: []
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: []
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: []
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: []
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: []
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: []
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: []
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Vuorká-Dávvira
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: Vuorká-Dávvirijda
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Vuorká-Dávvirin
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
#    Vuorká-Dávvira+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Propernoun - Ája: # ÁJA-porg
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Ája
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Ádjaga
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Ádjagav
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Ádjagin
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Ádjagij
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Ádjagis
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Ádjagijn
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: Ádjaga
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: Ádjagijda
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Ádjagin
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Ája+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
